Hawaii statutes.
§576D-1 Definitions. For the purpose
of this chapter:

"Absent parent" means a parent who is
absent from the family, whether or not the parent is a debtor parent.

"Agency" means the child support
enforcement agency established under section 576D-2.

"Child support" means payment for the
necessary support and maintenance of a child as required by law that includes
but is not limited to spousal support when being enforced in conjunction with
child support or medical support when a court or administrative order requires
the debtor parent to pay an amount in lieu of providing medical insurance
coverage or to reimburse for maternity and delivery expenses incurred when the
debtor parent's child was born.

"Compliance with an order of support"
means that an obligor:

(1) Is not delinquent in payments in an amount equal
to or greater than the sum of payments for child support for a three-month
period with regard to driver's licenses and recreational licenses and a
six-month period with regard to professional and vocational licenses; or

(2) Has obtained or maintained health insurance
coverage as required by a child support order.

"Custodial parent" means a parent,
guardian, or other person having custody of the child.

"Debtor parent" means any person who
is delinquent in payment of child support payments or who owes a public
assistance debt.

"Department" means the department of
attorney general, unless otherwise specified.

"License" means any license,
certification, registration, or permit issued by a licensing authority for
recreational purposes, or to conduct a trade or business, including a license
to practice a profession or vocation, or a license to operate any motor
vehicle, boat, airplane, or helicopter.

"Licensing authority" means any unit
of the state or county government, including agencies, departments, boards,
commissions, or authorities, or any other entity within the State or county
authorized by statute to grant or deny licenses.

"Obligor" means a responsible parent
obligated by court or administrative order to pay child support.

"Office" means the office of child
support hearings established pursuant to chapter 576E.

"Order of support" means a judgment,
decree, or order, whether temporary, final, or subject to modification, issued
by a court or an administrative agency of competent jurisdiction, for the
support and maintenance of a child, including a child who has attained the age
of majority under the law of the issuing state, or a child and the parent with
whom the child is living, which provides for monetary support, health care,
arrearages, or reimbursement, and which may include related costs and fees,
interest and penalties, income withholding, attorney's fees, and other relief.
An order of support may include spousal support when ordered to be paid in
conjunction with the support and maintenance of a child; provided that the
spousal support provision in an order of support shall only be enforced by the
agency when the support and maintenance of a child is being enforced. An order
of support may also include medical support when the debtor parent is ordered
to pay an amount in lieu of providing medical insurance coverage or to
reimburse for maternity and delivery expenses incurred when the debtor parent's
child was born.

"Other state"
includes:

(1) All states of the United States other than the
State of Hawaii;

(2) The District of Columbia;

(3) Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands,
and any territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the
United States;

(4) Any Indian or Alaska Native tribe, band, nation,
pueblo, village, or community that the Secretary of the Interior acknowledges
to exist as an Indian tribe and is included in the list of federally recognized
Indian tribal governments as published in the Federal Register that is
operating under Title IV-D; and

(5) A foreign country or a political subdivision
thereof:

(A) Declared to be a foreign reciprocating
country under Title IV-D; or

(B) With which the
State has entered into a reciprocal arrangement for the establishment and
enforcement of support obligations to the extent consistent with Title IV-D.

"Spousal support" means a legally
enforceable obligation assessed against an individual for the support of a
spouse or a former spouse who is living with a child or children for whom the
individual also owes support.

"State" means the State of Hawaii.

"Title IV-A", "Title IV-B",
"Title IV-C", "Title IV-D", and "Title IV-E" mean
Title IV-A, Title IV-B, Title IV-C, Title IV-D, and Title IV-E, respectively, of
the federal Social Security Act (August 14, 1935, Chapter 531, 49 Stat. 620),
as amended. [L 1986, c 332, pt of §2; am L 1989, c 133, §2; am L 1996, c 13,
§15; am L 1997, c 293, §26; am L 1998, c 83, §3 and c 153, §4; am L 2002, c 72,
§3 and c 84, §1; am L 2006, c 43, §1; am L 2011, c 79, §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next